test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s28x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - æra: # 
    skaða+V+Inf: skaða
    skaða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skaðar
    skaða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skaddi, skaðaði]
    skaða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skaddu, skaðaðu]
    skaða+V+Sup: [skatt, skaðað]
    skaða+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skaddur, skaðaður]
